Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
Any entity holding a special occasion license issued under this subdivision (33) or members of the licensee may transport wine and other alcoholic beverages to the location for which the special occasion license is issued;

“Special occasion license” also means a license, issued by the commission, to a bona-fide charitable organization, recognized as exempt from taxation by the internal revenue service pursuant to § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), which organization has been in continuous operation as a tax-exempt entity for at least twenty (20) years, and which organization has an annual budget of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). A special occasion license issued pursuant to this subdivision (33)(F) shall be authorized to sell wine in closed containers for consumption on or off the premises notwithstanding the restrictions of § 57-4-203. Any licensee holding a license issued pursuant to § 57-3-202, § 57-3-203, § 57-3-204, § 57-3-207, § 57-3-605 or § 57-4-101 may donate wine to an organization holding a special occasion license issued pursuant to this subdivision (33)(F) for an event conducted by the special occasion licensee. Any resident of Tennessee may donate wine, which brand of wine has been registered pursuant to § 57-3-301, to an organization holding a special occasion license issued pursuant to this subdivision (33)(F) for sale or consumption at an event conducted by the special occasion licensee;

A special occasion license under this section may also be issued to a bona fide charitable organization that benefits charities which support women and children in Middle Tennessee and which:

Holds the event in a county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-six thousand six hundred (126,600) nor more than one hundred twenty-six thousand seven hundred (126,700), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, on property used as a veterinary clinic located on a six and sixty-five one hundredths (6.65) acre lot that shares a common boundary between a municipality and the unincorporated area of such county;

Jurisdictions within the boundaries of such county have by referendum adopted both the sale of alcoholic beverages at retail package stores and for consumption on the premises;

Is a one-day annual event restricted to persons twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

Holds a grape stomp contest with teams made up of four (4) stompers and one (1) swabbie, who collects the juice created by the stompers in a jar, with the team producing the most juice winning the contest;

Includes numerous food vendors;

Has wine and spirits tastings; and

Where alcoholic beverages are served but not sold;

A special occasion license under this section may also be issued to a nonprofit community association for the purpose of serving samples of wine to persons holding a presold ticket for an annual fundraiser, the samples not to exceed two ounces (2 oz.) per wine per person to be served at the annual fundraiser conducted by the community association in any county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-six thousand six hundred (126,600) nor more than one hundred twenty-six thousand seven hundred (126,700), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. The fundraiser shall be an insured event with at least ten (10) wineries or restaurants participating in the event and food shall be available to attendees;

(A) “Sports authority facility” means a facility possessing the following characteristics:

The facility is owned or operated by a sports authority established under title 7, chapter 67, a public building authority or a governmental entity;

The facility is designed and used for presentation of professional sporting events and other activities, such as amateur sporting events, recreational activities and entertainment events and activities, and includes retail sales areas and retail food dispensing outlets, including, but not limited to, restaurant areas to accommodate liquor by the drink as well as food patronage;

A major or minor league professional baseball (American, National or Minor League), football (National Football League), basketball (National Basketball Association) or hockey (National Hockey League) franchise has entered into a long-term agreement to play its home games in the facility; and

The facility is located in a municipality or county having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Sports authority facility” also means a facility possessing the following characteristics:

The facility includes a stadium that was constructed in 1997 and that has a seating capacity of twenty thousand (20,000) or more;

The facility is designed and used for sporting and other municipal events;

The facility is located in a home rule municipality located in a county with a population of not less than three hundred thirty-six thousand four hundred (336,400) and not more than three hundred thirty-six thousand five hundred (336,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

The facility is located not more than one-half (1/2) mile from the Tennessee River;

“Sports authority facility” also means any facility that is designed and used for school-sanctioned public sporting events on a public university campus located in any county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Sports authority facility” also means any facility that is designed and used for school-sanctioned public sporting events on a four-year public university campus located in any county having a population of not less than two hundred sixty-two thousand six hundred (262,600) nor more than two hundred sixty-two thousand seven hundred (262,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Sports authority facility” also means any facility on the campus of a public institution of higher education that is designed and used for sporting events sanctioned by the institution;

“Sports authority facility” also means a facility that:

Is a professional motorsports speedway complex with a speedway approximately one-half (½) of a mile in length and a seating capacity of approximately one hundred sixty thousand (160,000);

Includes a dragstrip complex adjacent to the speedway with a dragstrip approximately one-quarter (¼) of a mile in length and that contains stadium seating and at least twenty (20) suites; and

Is located in a city with a population of not less than twenty-six thousand seven hundred (26,700) and not more than twenty-six thousand seven hundred nine (26,709), according to the 2010 federal census and any subsequent federal census; and

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (34)(F) includes all of the property constituting the facility. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

“Sports authority facility” also means any facility located in any county with a metropolitan form of government that has a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and that is equipped with two (2) or more ice rinks designed and used for various hockey and figure skating programs for children and adults that are supervised by a major or minor league professional hockey franchise;

“Suite” means any room or group of rooms, leased by the operator of a sports authority facility or a convention center, physically located within such facility or center, where access to such room or rooms is restricted to the lessee or such lessee's guests;

“Terminal building of a commercial air carrier airport” means a building, including any concourses thereof, used by commercial airlines and their customers for sale of airline tickets, enplaning and deplaning of airline passengers, loading and unloading of baggage and cargo, and for providing other related services for the convenience of airline passengers and others, located in any airport which is served by one (1) or more commercial airlines, and:

“Tennessee River resort district” means a club, hotel, motel, restaurant or limited service restaurant located within a jurisdiction that has elected Tennessee River resort district status pursuant to §67-6-103(a)(3)(F); provided, that for the purposes of this chapter, such district shall only extend inland for three (3) miles from the nearest bank of the Tennessee River. No entity licensed to sell alcoholic beverages within the boundaries of any such resort district shall discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin;

Is operated by a board of commissioners whose membership is appointed by the legislative bodies of five (5) or more local governments or whose membership is appointed pursuant to § 42-4-105; or

Is located in a municipality where this chapter has become effective in that municipality;

(A) “Theater” means any establishment in which motion pictures are exhibited to the public regularly for a charge. Such theater shall have an area that is enclosed by glass and which is accessed through a set of double doors by patrons who must be twenty-one (21) years of age or older to enter. Such theater shall be part of a retail and entertainment complex located one (1) block from a historical district that has been designated as a national historic landmark that centers around a public street or right-of-way. Such theater shall be located in a county having a population of eight hundred thousand (800,000) or more, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Theater” also means any establishment in which motion pictures are exhibited to the public regularly for a charge and which possesses the following characteristics:

Is a twelve (12) auditorium theater that is one hundred percent (100%) digital;

Is certified by the United States Green Building Council as the nation's first stand-alone theater boasting energy and environmental sensitive design;

Has one (1) auditorium restricted to patrons twenty-one (21) years of age or older; and

Is located downtown near a river in a county having a population of not less than three hundred seven thousand eight hundred (307,800) nor more than three hundred seven thousand nine hundred (307,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Theater” also means an establishment in which motion pictures are exhibited to the public regularly for a charge. The theater shall have a local beer permit for on-premises consumption. The theater shall regularly serve prepared food to patrons and each auditorium in which alcoholic beverages may be consumed shall allow dining at each seat in the auditorium. Prior to making a sale of any alcoholic beverage, a valid, government-issued document, such as a driver license or other form of identification deemed acceptable to the license holder that includes a photograph and date of birth of the adult consumer attempting to make the purchase, shall be produced to the licensee. The theater shall also periodically visually monitor all auditoriums in which alcoholic beverages are permitted and each beverage containing an alcoholic beverage shall be distinct from any other container used to serve nonalcoholic beverages;

(A) “Urban park center” means a facility or designated area possessing the following characteristics:

The center is owned, operated, or leased by a municipal or county government, or any agency or commission thereof;

The center is designed to contain outdoor recreational facilities, public museum buildings, exhibition buildings, retail sales areas, retail food dispensing outlets including, but not limited to, sale of package alcoholic and malt beverages, and restaurant areas to accommodate liquor-by-the-drink as well as food patronage; and

The center is located in a municipality or county having a population in excess of six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent census;

“Urban park center” also means an outdoor fixed structure amphitheater utilized as a performance venue, containing fixed seating for at least five thousand one hundred (5,100) persons. Such facility or designated area shall be secured by adequate perimeter fencing.

This subdivision (39)(B) applies in any county with a metropolitan form of government with a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also means a facility or designated area that possesses the following characteristics:

Consists of at least two (2) theater spaces in which live theater, concerts, and films are presented;

Contains at least ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq. ft.);

Contains permanent fixed seating for at least three hundred forty-nine (349) persons;

Contains one (1) performance space constructed prior to 1930 that contains a stage with a fly tower for stage rigging with a height of at least thirty feet (30');

Is operated by a not-for-profit corporation that qualifies as tax exempt under the Internal Revenue Code, § 501(c)(3) (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), and such facility or designated area is not a religious organization or a secondary or elementary school;

A major street is located not more than one hundred feet (100') from the nearest exterior wall of such facility or designated area; and

Is located within the jurisdictional limits of a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also includes a facility or designated area possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is owned, operated or leased by a municipal or county government, or any agency or commission thereof;

Has an outdoor fixed structure amphitheater utilized as a performance venue;

Provides or leases facilities for concerts, plays and programs of cultural, civic and educational interest; and

Is located in any municipality that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, in a referendum in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106, and the municipality has a population of not less than twenty-three thousand nine hundred twenty (23,920), nor more than twenty-three thousand nine hundred thirty (23,930), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also means a facility or designated area that possesses each of the following characteristics:

Is owned and maintained by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization;

Is used for the periodic showing or exhibition of animals;

Has a seating capacity of not less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) persons;

Includes an arena and a permanently constructed clubhouse or meeting room located on the grounds; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than forty-five thousand (45,000) nor more than forty-five thousand one hundred (45,100), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also means a facility or designated area possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located on a tract or tracts of land having at least five (5) contiguous acres;

Is located directly adjacent to property owned or leased by an airport authority created under state law;

Has an enclosed facility or designated area of at least twenty thousand square feet (20,000 sq. ft.) and one (1) room with more than fourteen thousand square feet (14,000 sq. ft.);

Has an exterior garden or gardens with sculpture;

Is leased or owned by a not-for-profit corporation that qualifies under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

Is located within a county having a metropolitan form of government with a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

An urban park center licensed under this subdivision (39)(F) shall have the privilege of granting a franchise for the provision of food or beverage, including alcoholic beverages, on its premises, and the holder of such franchise shall also be considered an urban park center under this subdivision (39)(F). The premises of an urban park center under this subdivision (39)(F) shall include all enclosed and outdoor areas of the property described in this subdivision (39)(F);

“Urban park center” also includes a facility or designated area possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located in a building constructed in 1883 that was originally used as a flour mill and eventually became a cannery;

Is an entertainment complex open to the public with three (3) facilities used for live music performances;

Serves or sells food to patrons;

Is approximately fifty-two thousand square feet (52,000 sq. ft.); and

Is located within a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also includes a facility or designated area possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located approximately two (2) blocks from Interstate 40;

Is located in a building constructed in the 1920s as an automobile factory;

Is located in a building remodeled in 2011 as a live music venue open to the public;

Serves or sells food to patrons; and

Is located within a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also includes a facility or designated area possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located in the historic Elliston Place neighborhood;

Is located approximately three (3) blocks from a private university and approximately one (1) block from a nonprofit hospital;

Serves or sells food to patrons;

Was opened to the public in 1971 as a live music venue;

Has a stage that is four feet (4') high and has an indoor balcony; and

Is located within a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also includes a facility or designated area possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located on 8th Avenue approximately one (1) block from Interstate 65;

Is a live music venue that opened to the public in 2001;

Is located beneath an independent and nationally acclaimed record store;

Serves or sells food to patrons;

Is approximately one thousand eight hundred square feet (1,800 sq. ft.); and

Is located within a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also includes a facility or designated area possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located on Forrest Avenue across from a branch of a public library;

Is a live music venue that promotes local artists that opened to the public in 2003;

Serves or sells food to patrons;

Is approximately two thousand seven hundred square feet (2,700 sq. ft.) and has an enclosed exterior patio; and

Is located within a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also includes a facility or designated area possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located on First Avenue South;

Is owned, operated, or leased by a governmental entity;

Is a facility or designated area designed and used for the presentation of live outdoor music and other events and includes retail sales areas and retail food dispensing outlets, including, but not limited to, restaurant areas to accommodate sales of alcoholic beverages and food; and

Is located in a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Urban park center” also includes a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located on a tract or tracts of land having at least fifty (50) contiguous acres;

A state highway is not more than seven hundred fifty feet (750') from the nearest property line;

A commercial railroad track is not more than seven hundred fifty feet (750') from the nearest property line;

Is adjacent to a municipal park having over one thousand nine hundred (1,900) acres;

Has an art museum that was originally constructed prior to 1935 as a private residence;

Has exterior gardens with a stream or streams, pools, fountains, and a stone grotto;

Has a woodland sculpture trail that is over one (1) mile in length;

Is leased or owned by a not-for-profit corporation that qualifies as tax exempt under the Internal Revenue Code § 501(c)(3), (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)); and

Is located within a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

An urban park center licensed under this subdivision (39)(M) shall have the privilege of granting a franchise pursuant to a written contract for a period of not less than one (1) year for the provision of food or beverage, including alcoholic beverages, on the premises of the urban park center, and the holder of such franchise shall be disclosed to the commission consistent with the disclosures made by the licensee and shall also be considered an urban park center under this subdivision (39)(M). The premises of an urban park center licensed under this subdivision (39)(M) shall include all enclosed and outdoor areas of the property described in this subdivision (39)(M);

“Urban park center” also includes a commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located on approximately one and seven-tenths (1.7) acres of land and has approximately thirty-eight thousand one hundred thirty-five square feet (38,135 sq. ft.) of interior space;

The facility is located no more than ten thousand one hundred feet (10,100') from a federal interstate highway and less than three thousand two hundred feet (3,200') west of a commercial railroad track. The structure must be not less than two hundred seventy feet (270') and not more than three hundred feet (300') above sea level. The structure must have been originally constructed in 2017;

The facility is located on a property that is adjacent to the intersection of Madison Avenue and Cooper Street;

The property that the facility is located on must have previously housed a structure used as a hotel business that was demolished in 2015;

The facility must be approximately one thousand six hundred eighty feet (1,680') to the south of a public park located on approximately three hundred forty-two (342) acres and that has a zoo that is accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums that is open to the public;

The facility consists of at least five (5) studio spaces in which live dance is performed, rehearsed, and instructed;

The facility is operated by a not-for-profit corporation that qualifies as tax exempt under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), and such facility or designated area is not a religious organization or a secondary or elementary school; and

The facility is located in a county with a charter form of government having a population of not less than nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (39)(N) shall mean any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including all enclosed and outdoor areas of the property. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises shall be covered under one (1) license issued under this subdivision (39)(N);

Notwithstanding chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (39)(N) shall mean, for beer permitting purposes, any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including all enclosed and outdoor areas of the property. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be permitted by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises shall be covered under one (1) beer permit issued under chapter 5 of this title; and

An urban park center licensed under this subdivision (39)(N) shall have the privilege of granting a franchise for the provision of food or beverage, including alcoholic beverages, on its premises, and the holder of such franchise shall also be considered an urban park center under this subdivision (39)(N);

“Urban park center” also means:

A commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located on land that is between one and one-half (1½) acres and that is adjacent to land owned by the electric power board of a county with a metropolitan form of government;

The facility has at least two (2) permanent structures constructed before 1978 and at least twenty-five thousand square feet (25,000 sq. ft.) of climate controlled space;

The facility formerly housed a custom car design business that had been serving the automotive community since 1968;

The facility is located in a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The facility is approximately five thousand ninety feet (5,090') to the northeast of a federal interstate highway;

The facility is approximately five thousand nine hundred sixty feet (5,960') to the northwest of a navigable waterway; and

The facility is approximately three hundred fifty feet (350') to the southwest from the main building of a high school that was originally constructed before 1933;

The premises of any facility described under this subdivision (39)(O) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including all buildings and outdoor areas between and around those buildings. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. An urban park center, as described in subdivision (39)(O)(i), may grant a franchise to one (1) or more entities authorizing such an entity to provide food or beverages, including alcoholic beverages, on its premises. A franchisee is deemed to be an urban park center under this subdivision (39)(O) and shall apply for and hold a license under this subdivision (39)(O). The commission shall enforce chapter 4 of this title against each franchisee as a licensee under this subdivision (39)(O) and shall not cite, penalize, or take any other adverse action against a franchisee for any violation committed by another franchisee on the licensed premises. There is a rebuttable presumption of liability for a specific franchisee for any underage sale based on the specific type of glass or the brand on the cup provided to the minor. In the absence of a glass or cup identifying the franchisee, the commission may determine which franchisee to cite for an underage sale. If the commission is unable to determine which franchisee committed the violation after conducting a reasonable investigation, the commission may issue a citation to one (1) or more franchisees that share the common space where the violation occurred;

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility described under this subdivision (39)(O) means, for the purpose of obtaining a beer permit, any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including all buildings and outdoor areas between and around those buildings. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing. An urban park center, as described in subdivision (39)(O)(i), may grant a franchise to one (1) or more entities authorizing such an entity to provide food or beverages, including beer, on its premises. A franchisee is deemed to be an urban park center under this subdivision (39)(O) and shall apply for and hold a beer permit. The beer board shall enforce chapter 5 of this title against each franchisee as a beer permittee and shall not cite, penalize, or take any other adverse action against a franchisee for any violation committed by another franchisee on the licensed premises. There is a rebuttable presumption of liability for a specific franchisee for any underage sale based on the specific type of glass or the brand on the cup provided to the minor. In the absence of a glass or cup identifying the franchisee, the beer board may determine which franchisee to cite for an underage sale. If the beer board is unable to determine which franchisee committed the violation after conducting a reasonable investigation, the beer board may issue a citation to one (1) or more franchisees that share the common space where the violation occurred; and

The licensee described in subdivision (39)(O)(i) and any franchisee licensed under this subdivision (39)(O) may store beer and alcoholic beverages in a central storage location in the facility. Each licensee shall store its inventory of beer and alcoholic beverages in a separately locked cage or other storage area;

“Urban park center” also means a facility or designated area having all of the following characteristics:

The easternmost corner of the structure that houses the facility is approximately one thousand four hundred feet (1,400') southwest of a public park that is adjacent to a navigable waterway;

The easternmost corner of the structure that houses the facility is approximately one thousand one hundred feet (1,100') southeast of a public park that is adjacent to a public library constructed in 2001;

The easternmost corner of the structure that houses the facility is approximately five hundred feet (500') northwest of a public park that contains a walkway recognizing professionals in the music industry;

The easternmost corner of the structure that houses the facility is approximately one thousand five hundred feet (1,500') southwest of a railway station providing commuter rail service that employs standard gauge locomotives and coaches;

The property that houses the facility is across a public street from a live performance venue that was originally constructed in 1892 as a religious facility;

The property that houses the facility is adjacent to a facility originally constructed in 1925 that houses the Grand Lodge of Free and Accepted Masons of Tennessee;

The facility is located in a mixed used development located at the intersection of a federal highway and a municipal street;

The facility is owned, operated, or leased by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization;

The facility occupies no less than fifty thousand square feet (50,000 sq. ft.) of commercial space used as a museum that offers informational and educational programming to the community, features historical exhibits, live and pre-recorded music, and may be utilized for public and private occasions, weddings, community meetings, corporate functions, and other events;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

The facility is located in a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (39)(P) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (39)(P) means for beer permitting purposes any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be permitted by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing; and

An urban park center licensed under this subdivision (39)(P) shall have the privilege of granting a franchise for the provision of food or beverage, including alcoholic beverages, on its premises, and the holder of the franchise is deemed to be an urban park center under this subdivision (39)(P);

“Urban park center” also includes a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is owned, operated, or leased by a municipal or county government, or any agency or commission thereof;

Has an outdoor fixed-structure stage utilized as a performance venue;

Provides or leases facilities for concerts, plays, and programs of cultural, civic, and educational interest; and

Is located in a municipality that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, in a referendum in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106, and that has a population of not less than four thousand fifty (4,050) and not more than four thousand fifty-nine (4,059), according to the 2010 federal census and any subsequent federal census; and

This subdivision (39)(Q) only applies in a city with a population of not less than four thousand fifty (4,050) and not more than four thousand fifty-nine (4,059), according to the 2010 federal census and any subsequent federal census upon the adoption of an ordinance by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its governing body;

“Urban park center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Provides or leases facilities for flea markets, fairs, exposition events, consumer shows, indoor and outdoor sports, meetings, and banquets;

Has a paved motorsports racetrack that is at least one-half (½) mile in length with banking in the turns of eighteen (18) degrees;

Is located on a tract of land having at least one hundred twenty-eight (128) acres;

Has a one (1) acre dog park and other green space that is used for parking, public recreation, and events; and

Is owned by, and located in, a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (39)(R) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including all enclosed and outdoor areas of the property. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The designated premises may be covered under multiple licenses issued under this subdivision (39)(R) for individual facilities within the urban park center;

An urban park center licensed under this subdivision (39)(R) may grant a franchise for the provision of food or beverage, including alcoholic beverages, on its premises, and the holder of such franchise is also considered an urban park center under this subdivision (39)(R); and

An urban park center licensed under this subdivision (39)(R) shall provide a report to the commission, on or before October 1 each year, that details the gross revenue the urban park center earned from the sale of alcoholic beverages and the amount retained by, or paid to, any franchisee of the urban park center for the sale of alcoholic beverages;

“Zoological institution” means a facility that contains a zoological garden or collection of living animals and provides for their care and housing for public exhibition and further possesses the following characteristics:

The zoo is operated on property leased by a county having a metropolitan form of government and has been opened to the public on that property at least since 1997;

The zoo has been accredited by and maintains the accreditation of the Association of Zoos and Aquariums (AZA); and

The zoo is located in a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Zoological institution” means a facility that contains a zoological garden or collection of living animals and provides for their care and housing for public exhibition and further possesses the following characteristics:

The zoo is operated on property owned by a city and has been opened to the public on that property at least since 1937;

The zoo has been accredited by and maintains the accreditation of the Association of Zoos and Aquariums (AZA); and

The zoo is located in a county having a population of not less than three hundred seven thousand eight hundred (307,800) nor more than three hundred seven thousand nine hundred (307,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

“Zoological institution” means a facility that contains a zoological garden or collection of living animals and provides for their care and housing for public exhibition and further possesses the following characteristics:

The zoo is operated on property owned by a city and has been opened to the public on that property at least since 1948;

The zoo has been accredited by and maintains the accreditation of the Association of Zoos and Aquariums (AZA); and

The zoo is located in a county having a population of not less than three hundred eighty two thousand (382,000) nor more than three hundred eighty two thousand one hundred (382,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Such club may not compensate or pay any officer, director, agent or employee any profits from the sale of alcoholic or malt beverages based upon the volume of such beverages sold;

It is the express intention of the general assembly that the law concerning the purchase or possession of alcoholic beverages by persons under twenty-one (21) years of age be strictly enforced by such club;

“Club” also means a for-profit recreational club, organized and existing under the laws of this state, which is located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred thirty thousand (130,000) nor more than one hundred thirty-one thousand (131,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and further possesses the following characteristics:

The club shall be adjacent to a residential development consisting of at least one hundred (100) residential units, and the club property and such residential development shall consist of at least two hundred (200) acres;

The residential development shall be adjacent to a lake with an area greater than twenty (20) acres;
